da: Grebstype på gribebræt: Korkgreb; Skumgreb; Medfølger ikke; Gummigreb; Griptape med sandpapir; Struktureret plastikgreb; Andet
en: Fingerboard grip type: Cork grip; Foam grip; Not included; Rubber grip; Sandpaper grip tape; Textured plastic grip; Other
sv: Greppbräda – typ av grepp: Korkgrepp; Skumgrepp; Ingår ej; Gummigrepp; Griptape med sandpapper; Texturerat plastgrepp; Övrigt
th: ประเภทการจับฟิงเกอร์บอร์ด: กริปไม้ก๊อก; กริปโฟม; ไม่รวมในชุด; กริปยาง; กริปเทปกระดาษทราย; กริปพลาสติกแบบมีพื้นผิว; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Tipo de aderência da escala do violão: Grip de cortiça; Grip de espuma; Não incluído; Grip de borracha; Lixa de papel; Grip de plástico texturizado; Outros
fr: Type de prise sur la touche: Grip en liège; Grip en mousse; Non inclus; Grip en caoutchouc; Bande antidérapante en papier de verre; Grip en plastique texturé; Autre
it: Tipo di impugnatura della tastiera: Grip in sughero; Grip in schiuma; Non incluso; Grip in gomma; Grip in carta vetrata; Grip in plastica testurizzata; Altro
vi: Kiểu bề mặt bám của bàn phím: Mặt nhám bần; Mặt nhám mút xốp; Không bán kèm; Mặt nhám cao su; Băng nhám giấy ráp; Mặt nhám nhựa có vân; Khác
ru: Тип сцепления накладки грифа: Пробковый гриптейп; Пенный гриптейп; Не входит в комплект; Резиновый гриптейп; Наждачный гриптейп; Текстурированный пластиковый гриптейп; Другое
es: Tipo de agarre de diapasón: Agarre de corcho; Agarre de espuma; No incluido; Agarre de goma; Lija de agarre; Agarre de plástico texturizado; Otro
ro-RO: Tipul de aderență al tastaturii: Prindere din plută; Prindere din spumă; Nu este inclus; Prindere din cauciuc; Bandă aderentă tip șmirghel; Prindere din plastic texturat; Altele
nl: Type gripvlak vingerboard: Kurkgrip; Foamgrip; Niet inbegrepen; Rubbergrip; Schuurpapier-griptape; Plastic grip met textuur; Overige
sk-SK: Typ úchopu hmatníka: Korkový grip; Penový grip; Nie je súčasťou; Gumený grip; Brúsny papierový grip; Štruktúrovaný plastový grip; Iné
fi: Otelaudan otetyyppi: Korkkigrippi; Vaahtomuovigrippi; Ei sisälly; Kumigrippi; Hiekkapaperigrippi; Kuvioitu muovigrippi; Muu
pt-PT: Tipo de revestimento do fingerboard: Grip de cortiça; Grip de espuma; Não incluído; Grip de borracha; Fita aderente de lixa; Grip de plástico texturado; Outro
el: Τύπος πρόσφυσης ταστιέρας: Λαβή από φελλό; Λαβή από αφρό; Δεν περιλαμβάνεται; Λαβή από καουτσούκ; Ταινία grip γυαλόχαρτου; Ανάγλυφη πλαστική λαβή; Άλλο
zh-TW: 手指滑板握把類型: 軟木防滑貼; 泡棉防滑貼; 不含; 橡膠防滑貼; 砂紙防滑貼; 紋理塑膠防滑貼; 其他
ja: フィンガーボードグリップタイプ: コルクグリップ; フォームグリップ; 含まれていない; ラバーグリップ; サンドペーパーグリップテープ; テクスチャードプラスチックグリップ; その他
zh-CN: 手指滑板防滑类型: 软木防滑垫; 泡棉防滑垫; 不包含; 橡胶防滑垫; 砂纸防滑贴; 纹理塑料防滑垫; 其他
de: Art des Fingerboard-Griffes: Kork-Grip; Schaumstoff-Grip; Nicht im Lieferumfang enthalten; Gummi-Grip; Schmirgelpapier-Griptape; Strukturierter Kunststoff-Grip; Sonstige
sl-SI: Vrsta oprijema klaviature: Oprijem iz plute; Oprijem iz pene; Ni vključeno; Gumijast oprijem; Grob trak; Teksturiran plastičen oprijem; Drugo
hu: Fogólap tapadásának típusa: Parafa markolat; Szivacs markolat; Nem tartozék; Gumi markolat; Csiszolópapíros grip szalag; Texturált műanyag markolat; Egyéb
pl: Typ taśmy do fingerboardu: Grip korkowy; Grip piankowy; Brak w zestawie; Grip gumowy; Grip z papieru ściernego; Grip z teksturowanego plastiku; Inne
ko: 지판 그립 유형: 코르크 그립; 폼 그립; 포함되지 않음; 고무 그립; 사포 그립 테이프; 질감 있는 플라스틱 그립; 기타
tr: Klavye tutuş tipi: Mantar grip; Köpük grip; Dahil değil; Kauçuk grip; Zımparalı grip bandı; Dokulu plastik grip; Diğer
cs: Typ úchopu na hmatníku: Korkový grip; Pěnový grip; Není součástí; Gumový grip; Grip tape z brusného papíru; Texturovaný plastový grip; Jiné
hr-HR: Vrsta hvata na hvataljci (grif ploči): Grip od pluta; Grip od pjene; Nije uključeno; Gumeni grip; Grip traka od brusnog papira; Teksturirani plastični grip; Ostalo
lt-LT: Žaislinės riedlentės sukibimo tipas: Kamštinė danga; Poroloninė danga; Nepridedama; Guminė danga; Švitrinio popieriaus juosta; Tekstūruoto plastiko danga; Kita
nb: Grepstype på fingerbrett: Korkgrep; Skumgrep; Ikke inkludert; Gummigrep; Griptape (sandpapir); Teksturert plastgrep; Annet
bg-BG: Тип сцепление на фингърборда: Корков грип; Грип от пяна; Не е включен; Гумен грип; Грип лента тип шкурка; Текстуриран пластмасов грип; Други